Maryland, session 2025, HB0725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–127.
(a) (1) In this section, “dually enrolled student” means a student who is dually
enrolled in AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE AND:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0725*

HOUSE BILL 725
(i) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC secondary school in the State; [and]
OR
(ii) [An institution of higher education in the State] A HOME
SCHOOL IN THE STATE.
(2) “Dually enrolled student” includes a student enrolled in a credit or
noncredit certificate or license program, course, or sequence of courses that leads to
certification or licensure at an institution of higher education in the State.
(b) A public institution of higher education may not charge tuition to a dually
enrolled student.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, for each dually enrolled student who
is enrolled in a public school in the county, the county board shall pay 75% of the cost of
tuition for a public institution of higher education in the State.
(d) (1) If there is an agreement before July 1, 2020, between a public,
PRIVATE, OR HOME school and a public institution of higher education in which the public
institution of higher education charges less than 75% of the cost of tuition to a dually
enrolled student, the county board shall pay the cost of tuition under the existing
agreement.
(2) Every 2 years, a public, PRIVATE, OR HOME school and a public
institution of higher education may evaluate and modify an agreement made under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
18–1401.
(a) In this section, “part–time student” means a student who:
(1) Is enrolled in a degree–granting program at an eligible institution and
taking at least 3 but no more than 11 semester hours of courses each semester; or
(2) Is dually enrolled in [a secondary school in the State and] an institution
of higher education IN THE STATE AND:
(I) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE
STATE; OR
(II) A HOME SCHOOL IN THE STATE.
(b) In cooperation with the institutions of higher education in the State, the
Commission shall establish and administer a grant program for undergraduate part–time
students.

HOUSE BILL 725 3
(c) A recipient of a part–time grant shall:
(1) Except as provided in § 18–1401.1 of this subtitle, be a resident of the
State; and
(2) Have demonstrated a definite financial need according to criteria
established by the Commission.
(d) For courses completed under the program, a recipient who is dually enrolled
in a secondary school in the State and an institution of higher education may not be
required to receive credit from a secondary school and an institution of higher education at
the same time.
18–14A–01.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Dually enrolled student” means a student who is dually enrolled in:
(i) 1. A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC secondary school in the State;
OR
2. A HOME SCHOOL IN THE STATE; and
(ii) An institution of higher education in the State.
(3) “Grant” means the Early College Access Grant.
(b) There is an Early College Access Grant that provides financial assistance to
dually enrolled students in the State.
(c) In cooperation with institutions of higher education in the State, the
Commission shall administer the Grant.
(d) A recipient of a grant shall:
(1) Be a dually enrolled student; and
(2) Demonstrate financial need according to criteria established by the
Commission.
(e) For courses completed under the Grant, a recipient is not required to receive
credit from a secondary school and an institution of higher education at the same time.
18–14A–02.

HOUSE BILL 725
(a) Funds for the Grant shall be allocated by the Commission to an institution of
higher education based on the number of dually enrolled students receiving credit for
courses completed at the institution.
(b) Funds for the Grant shall be as provided in the annual budget of the
Commission by the Governor.
18–14A–03.
The Commission shall:
(1) Establish guidelines for awarding the Grant to dually enrolled
students; and
(2) Adopt any other guidelines or regulations necessary for the
administration of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.